GRAMMARS/FRENCH/FST/src/lowercase-names.xfst
# ---------------------------------------------------------------
# TYPE:		fst script
# CONTENT:	map first names to lower case
#		French
#
# AUTHOR:	A. Schiller
# CREATED:	02-Mar-2010
# ---------------------------------------------------------------
# USAGE: fst -utf8 lex.fst -l [ThisFile]

load stack ../data/Basictok.fst

define LEX

# lower case mapping

define DECAPALL [
        A -> a , B -> b , C -> c , D -> d , E -> e 
        , F -> f , G -> g , H -> h , I -> i , J -> j 
        , K -> k , L -> l , M -> m , N -> n , O -> o 
        , P -> p , Q -> q , R -> r , S -> s , T -> t 
        , U -> u , V -> v , W -> w , X -> x , Y -> y , Z -> z 
        , Á -> á , À -> à , Â -> â , Ä -> ä , Å -> å, Æ -> æ , Ã -> ã 
        , É -> é , È -> è , Ê -> ê , Ë -> ë 
        , Í -> í , Ì -> ì, Î -> î , Ï -> ï 
        , Ó -> ó , Ò -> ò, Ô -> ô, Ö -> ö , Ø -> ø , Õ -> õ 
        , Ú -> ú , Ù -> ù , Ü -> ü 
        , Ç -> ç , Ð -> ð , Ñ -> ñ , Ý -> ý
];

define DECAPOPT   [
        A (->) a , B (->) b , C (->) c , D (->) d , E (->) e 
        , F (->) f , G (->) g , H (->) h , I (->) i , J (->) j 
        , K (->) k , L (->) l , M (->) m , N (->) n , O (->) o 
        , P (->) p , Q (->) q , R (->) r , S (->) s , T (->) t 
        , U (->) u , V (->) v , W (->) w , X (->) x , Y (->) y , Z (->) z 
        , Á (->) á , À (->) à , Â (->) â , Ä (->) ä , Å (->) å, Æ (->) æ , Ã (->) ã 
        , É (->) é , È (->) è , Ê (->) ê , Ë (->) ë 
        , Í (->) í , Ì (->) ì, Î (->) î , Ï (->) ï 
        , Ó (->) ó , Ò (->) ò, Ô (->) ô, Ö (->) ö , Ø (->) ø , Õ (->) õ 
        , Ú (->) ú , Ù (->) ù , Ü (->) ü 
        , Ç (->) ç , Ð (->) ð , Ñ (->) ñ , Ý (->) ý 
];


# extract first names

define NAME  [?* "+PreN" ?* "+NOUN_INV" ] .o. LEX ;

# map upper case characters
define NAMELOW	 [ NAME .o. DECAPOPT ]; 
